Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.100

Compensation—Travel expenses.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Employees of the commission may also be reimbursed for actual travel expenses when out of state on official commission business.

[ 1984 c 287 s 13; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 13; 1969 c 129 s 10.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.